Utah statutes.
53A-2-101.5.   Filing of notice and plat relating to school district
boundary changes including creation, consolidation, division, or dissolution
-- Recording requirements -- Effective date.
(1) The county legislative body shall:
(a)  within 30 days after the creation, consolidation, division, or
dissolution of a school district, file with the lieutenant governor:
(i)  a copy of a notice of an impending boundary action, as defined in Section
67-1a-6.5, that meets the requirements of Subsection 67-1a-6.5(3); and
(ii)  except in the case of a dissolution, a copy of an approved final local
entity plat, as defined in Section 67-1a-6.5; and
(b)  upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of a certificate of boundary
action under Section 67-1a-6.5:
(i)  if the school district is or, in the case of dissolution, was located
within the boundary of a single county, submit to the recorder of that county:
(A)  the original:
(I)  notice of an impending boundary action;
(II)  certificate of boundary action; and
(III)  except in the case of dissolution, approved final local entity plat;
and
(B)  if applicable, a certified copy of the resolution approving the boundary
action; or
(ii)  if the school district is or, in the case of a dissolution, was located
within the boundaries of more than a single county:
(A)  submit to the recorder of one of those counties:
(I)  the original of the documents listed in Subsections (1)(b)(i)(A)(I),
(II), and (III); and
(II)  if applicable, a certified copy of the resolution approving the boundary
action; and
(B)  submit to the recorder of each other county:
(I)  a certified copy of the documents listed in Subsections (1)(b)(i)(A)(I),
(II), and (III); and
(II)  if applicable, a certified copy of the resolution approving the boundary
action.
(2) (a)  Upon the lieutenant governor's issuance of the certificate under
Section 67-1a-6.5, the creation, consolidation, division, dissolution, or
other change affecting the boundary of a new or existing school district that
was the subject of the action has legal effect.
(b) (i)  As used in this Subsection (2)(b), "affected area" means:
(A)  in the case of the creation of a school district, the area within the
school district's boundary;
(B)  in the case of the consolidation of multiple school districts, the area
within the boundary of each school district that is consolidated into another
school district;
(C)  in the case of the division of a school district, the area within the
boundary of the school district created by the division; and
(D)  in the case of an addition to an existing school district, the area added
to the school district.
(ii)  The effective date of a boundary action, as defined in Section 17-23-20,
for purposes of assessing property within the school district is governed by
Section 59-2-305.5.
(iii)  Until the documents listed in Subsection (1)(b) are recorded in the
office of the recorder of each county in which the property is located, a
school district may not levy or collect a property tax on property within the
affected area.
